Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
481L]

MOTOR
VEHICLE LEASE DISCLOSURE ACT

Section

481L-1 Definitions

481L-2 Disclosures

481L-3 Trade-in vehicle

481L-4 Civil remedies

Cross References

Terminal rental adjustment clause; vehicle leases, see
§286-52.4.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next